Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.170

Information preparation and distribution.

The board of directors of the public stadium authority shall have authority to authorize the expenditure of funds for the public purposes of preparing and distributing information to the general public about the stadium and exhibition center.

[ 1997 c 220 s 116 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]